Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 52

Governor's Books from Birth Fund

4-52-101. Establishment.

There is established the “Governor's Books from Birth Fund.”

Acts 2005, ch. 416, § 1.

4-52-102. Purpose.

The fund shall promote and foster the development of a comprehensive statewide program for encouraging preschool children to read.

Acts 2005, ch. 416, § 1.

4-52-103. Staff, office space and supplies — Travel expenses — Administrative attachment.

Any agency of state government may provide staff and other assistance to the fund, subject to existing statutes, rules, and policies.

Subject to existing statutes, rules, and policies, the fund may procure office space and supplies necessary to enable the fund to effectively carry out the program.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations, as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

For administrative purposes, the fund shall be attached to the department of education.

Acts 2005, ch. 416, § 1.

4-52-104. Contracts and agreements.

The fund may enter into such contractual and promotional agreements necessary to effectively stimulate a statewide program for encouraging preschool children to read.

Acts 2005, ch. 416, § 1.

4-52-105. Partnership with nonprofit public benefit corporation.

The fund is authorized to partner with a nonprofit public benefit corporation that is organized solely to promote and encourage reading by the children of the state of Tennessee, for the purpose of implementing the early reading initiatives of the fund.

The nonprofit partner shall have its board of directors elected by a process approved annually by the governor or the governor's designee. The nonprofit partner's board may select its own chairperson.

The nonprofit partner shall be properly incorporated under the laws of the state of Tennessee, and approved by the internal revenue service as an organization that is exempt from federal income tax under § 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(a)), by virtue of being an organization described in § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)).

The nonprofit partner may receive funds from the general public, and also may receive funds from the state of Tennessee, at such times and in such amounts as appropriated by the general assembly.

Costs to underwrite the nonprofit partner's activities related to the fund shall be borne from revenues of the nonprofit partner and no state employee shall benefit from such proceeds.

The nonprofit partner may exercise all powers authorized under the Tennessee Nonprofit Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 51-68.

The nonprofit partner may receive staff and other assistance from any agency of state government, subject to existing statutes, rules, and policies.

All funds that are held by the fund on June 30, 2005, shall be transferred to the nonprofit partner for the purposes described in this chapter.

Acts 2005, ch. 416, § 1.

4-52-106. Authorization to work with local government, private organizations and citizens.

The governor's books from birth fund and the nonprofit partner may work with local governments, private organizations and citizens as it plans and engages in activities related to the fund.

Acts 2005, ch. 416, § 1.

4-52-107. Participation by nonprofit partner in retirement system.

The nonprofit partner shall be eligible to be a participating employer in the Tennessee consolidated retirement system upon passage of a resolution by the nonprofit's board of directors authorizing:

An actuarial study; and

Participation, and accepting the liability as a result of the participation, by its full-time employees.

The employees of the nonprofit partner shall make the same contributions, participate in the same manner, and shall be eligible for the same benefits as employees of local governments participating in the retirement system under this chapter.

The employees of the nonprofit partner shall be entitled to credit for prior service, as approved by the board of directors of the nonprofit, under the same provisions that apply to employees of local governments.

The retirement system shall not be liable for the payment of retirement allowances or other payments on account of employees of the nonprofit partner, or the beneficiaries of such employees, for which reserves have not been previously created from funds contributed by the nonprofit partner, its employees or the nonprofit partner and its employees.

In case of the withdrawal of the nonprofit partner as a participating employer, the benefits of the members and beneficiaries shall be determined in accordance with § 8-35-211.

It is the legislative intent that the state shall realize no increased cost as a result of this section. All costs associated with retirement coverage, including administrative costs, shall be the responsibility of the nonprofit partner.

Acts 2005, ch. 416, § 1.

4-52-108. Participation by nonprofit partner in health insurance plan.

The nonprofit partner may participate, the same as an eligible quasi-governmental organization, in the health insurance plan authorized under §8-27-207 [repealed and reenacted. See Compiler's Notes], to provide health insurance for its employees, as long as such nonprofit partner satisfies each of the requirements of §8-27-207 [repealed and reenacted. See Compiler's Notes]. For the purpose of determining the distribution of premium for participating in the specific policies authorized by the state insurance committee, the nonprofit partner shall pay the same amount as the state government for employee participation in such coverage. An employee of the nonprofit partner electing to continue such coverage shall continue to meet the eligibility criteria of a state employee to participate in the state plan. Each employee of the nonprofit partner also is subject to the same retiree continuation provisions as state employees, as provided in title 8, chapter 27, part 2 [repealed and reenacted. See Compiler's Notes].

Acts 2005, ch. 416, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2005, ch. 416, § 1 provided that, if, within sixty (60) days of June 17, 2005, a state employee becomes an employee of the nonprofit partner, such employee is eligible to continue to participate in the insurance plans authorized in §8-27-201 [now § 8-27-202].

Section8-27-207 referred to in this section was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2015, ch. 426, effective May 18, 2015. For current comparable provisions, see now §8-27-702.

Title 8, chapter 27, part 2 referred to in this section was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2015, ch. 426, effective May 18, 2015. For current comparable provisions, see title 8, chapter 27, part 7.

4-52-109. Annual report.

The nonprofit partner shall annually submit to the governor and the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives, within ninety (90) days after the end of its fiscal year, a complete and detailed report setting forth its operation and accomplishments.

Acts 2005, ch. 416, § 1.

4-52-110. Audit.

The nonprofit partner shall be subject to examination and audit by the comptroller of the treasury in the same manner as prescribed for departments and agencies of the state.

Acts 2005, ch. 416, § 1.

4-52-111. Intentional destruction of books for Imagination Library Program prohibited — Delivery to intended recipients.

No person shall intentionally destroy books intended to be delivered to children enrolled in Tennessee's Imagination Library program.

Any person in possession of undelivered or undeliverable Imagination Library program books shall make every effort to deliver the books to their intended recipients or, in the alternative, make the books available to any pre-kindergarten, kindergarten or elementary education program.

Acts 2014, ch. 681, § 1.